src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in the Paamese language are numbers.

LEXICON numtag 
+Num: # ;

LEXICON ordtag 
+Num+Ord: # ;

LEXICON Numerals
tai  numtag ;	  ! 1
elu  numtag ;	  ! 2
etel  numtag ;	  ! 3
ehat  numtag ;	  ! 4
elim  numtag ;	  ! 5
ahetai  numtag ;  ! 6
oulu  numtag ;	  ! 7
outel  numtag ;	  ! 8
ouhat  numtag ;	  ! 9
halualim numtag ; ! 10


elueni ordtag ;	 ! 2.
eteluni ordtag ; ! 3.
ehatini ordtag ; ! 4.
elimeni ordtag ; ! 5.

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
